Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5417.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7. The Except as otherwise provided in section 7c, the fund shall have the powers and duties provided in this act, the powers delegated by other laws or executive orders, including, but not limited to, the power to do 1 or more of the following: (a) Sue and be sued; to have a seal and alter the seal at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; and to make and amend bylaws. (b) Solicit and accept gifts, grants, loans, and other aids from any person or the federal, state, or a local government or any agency of the federal, state, or a local government, or to participate in any other way in any federal, state, or local government program. (c) Make grants, loans, and investments; to guarantee and insure loans, leases, bonds, notes, or other indebtedness, whether public or private; and to issue letters of credit. (d) Construct; acquire by gift, purchase, installment purchase, or lease; and reconstruct, improve, repair, or equip a project or any part of a project. (e) Borrow money and issue bonds and notes to finance part or all of the project costs of a project, including the Special Purpose FWC Settlement Entity, or of a loan under subdivision (r) for an export transaction, and to secure those bonds and notes by mortgage, assignment, or pledge of any of its money, revenues, income, and properties. The authority provided by this subdivision includes, but is not limited to, issuing bonds and notes to acquire and install machinery, equipment, furnishings, and other personal property, notwithstanding that the fund does not own or propose to own or finance the building or land in or near to which the machinery, equipment, furnishings, and other personal property is or is to be located. (f) Acquire or contract to acquire from any person, municipality, the federal or state government, or any agency of the foregoing, or otherwise, leaseholds, real or personal property or any interest in real or personal property; to own, hold, clear, improve, and rehabilitate and to sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber leaseholds, real or personal property or any interest in real or personal property, as is convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this act and of the fund. (g) Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the fund's property, assets, or activities. (h) Invest any money of the fund at the fund's discretion, in any obligations determined proper by the fund, and name and use depositories for its money. (i) Engage personnel as is necessary and engage the services of private consultants, managers, counsel, auditors, engineers, and scientists for rendering professional management and technical assistance and advice, payable out of any money of the fund legally available for this purpose. (j) Charge, impose, and collect fees and charges in connection with any transaction and provide for reasonable penalties for delinquent payment of fees or charges. (k) Indemnify and procure insurance indemnifying any members of the board from personal loss or accountability from liability asserted by a person on the bonds or notes of the fund or from any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds, notes, insurance, or guarantees; by reason of acquisition, construction, ownership, or operation of a project; or by reason of any other action taken or the failure to act by the fund. (l) Enter into a lease for the use or sale of a project. The lease may provide for options to purchase or renew. (m) Mortgage or create security interests in a project or any part of a project, or in a lease or loan, or in the rents, revenues, or sums to be paid thereunder, in favor of the holders of the bonds or notes issued by the fund. (n) Convey or release a project or any part of a project to a lessee, purchaser, or borrower under any agreement after provision has been made for the retirement in full of the bonds or notes issued for that project under terms and conditions provided in the agreement or as may be agreed with the holders of the bonds or notes, at any time where the obligation of the lessee, purchaser, or borrower to make the payments prescribed shall remain fixed as provided in the agreement notwithstanding the conveyance or release, or as may otherwise be agreed with the holders of the bonds or notes. (o) Make loans, participate in the making of loans, undertake commitments to make loans and mortgages, buy and sell loans and mortgages at public or private sale, rewrite loans and mortgages, discharge loans and mortgages, foreclose on a mortgage, commence an action to protect or enforce a right conferred upon the fund by a law, mortgage, loan, contract, or other agreement, bid for and purchase property which was the subject of the mortgage at a foreclosure or other sale, acquire or take possession of the property and in that event complete, administer, pay the principal and interest on obligations incurred in connection with that property, and dispose of and otherwise deal with the property, in a manner as may be necessary or desirable to protect the interests of the fund. (p) Certify, for the purpose of determining eligible investments for the basis of a single business tax credit, minority venture capital companies, as defined by law. (q) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, to create and operate centers, accounts, and funds as required or permitted by law for the use and disbursement of assets of the fund. The powers granted under this subdivision do not apply to chapter 8A. (r) Make loans to a financial institution to facilitate financing of all or part of an export related transaction including, but not limited to, pre-export working capital financing and postexport receivable financing. (s) Procure goods and services, purchase and sell real and personal property, and lease property independent of any other department or state agency. (t) Appoint any individuals, including strategic fund employees and MEDC employees, to boards to represent the interests of the fund. (u) Establish and operate a job training fund that will support the training of workers for Michigan businesses as determined by the fund. (v) Establish and operate a brownfield historic investment program that provides capital for projects as determined by the fund. (w) Take necessary and reasonable steps to pursue repayment of funds disbursed for any grant or loan for failing to comply with provisions of a written agreement as required under section 88r(2)(b)(iv) and section 90b(7). (x) Borrow money and issue bonds or notes for financing a Special Purpose FWC Settlement Entity, which entity may use the financed proceeds only to pay the expenses, costs, and fees associated with the Special Purpose FWC Settlement Entity, to reimburse this state for its initial $5,000,000.00 payment to the FWC Qualified Settlement Fund, and to pay the FWC Qualified Settlement Fund, and which shall be secured by a pledge of repayment from anticipated state appropriations and from any other sources. (y) Do all other things necessary or convenient to achieve the objectives and purposes of the fund, this act, or other laws that relate to the purposes and responsibilities of the fund. Sec. 7c. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the Michigan strategic fund shall not disburse, or cause to be disbursed, money for an economic incentive if the Michigan strategic fund is delinquent in submitting a legislatively required report. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to an economic incentive that is required to be disbursed under a written agreement that was entered into before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, unless the written agreement is amended or renewed on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (3) If the Michigan strategic fund enters into, or amends or renews, a written agreement for an economic incentive on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the Michigan strategic fund shall include a provision in the written agreement that money will not be disbursed under the written agreement if the Michigan strategic fund is delinquent in submitting a legislatively required report. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Economic incentive" means a grant, loan, tax capture or abatement, or other economic assistance or benefit provided under a program administered by, or under which an applicant must seek certification, approval, or other action by, the Michigan strategic fund under this act or another law of this state. (b) "Legislatively required report" means a report required to be submitted by the Michigan strategic fund to the legislature, a member of the legislature, or a committee of the legislature under this act or any other law of this state. (c) "Michigan strategic fund" includes the fund and the authorized officers, employees, and agents of the fund, including the MEDC and its employees.